New Jersey, session 221, A3202.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    (New section)  a.  A carrier shall provide coverage for expenses incurred in the treatment of suicidal ideation and attempted suicide for a woman who is within the postpartum period. b.    As used in this section: Attempted suicide means destructive behavior intended by an individual to result in that individuals harm or death. "Carrier" means an insurance company, health service corporation, hospital service corporation, medical service corporation, or health maintenance organization authorized to issue health benefits plans in this State, and shall include the State Health Benefits Program and the School Employees' Health Benefits Program. Postpartum period means one year after childbirth. Suicidal ideation means thinking about, considering, or making plans for suicide. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to all health benefits plans currently in effect in the State, or that are delivered, issued, executed or renewed in this State, or approved for issuance or renewal in this State by the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance, on or after the effective date of this act.